New York, session 2025-2026, S9114.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of education is authorized and directed to 2 conduct a survey regarding instruction on the mass starvation in Ireland 3 from 1845 until 1850 within the state. Such survey shall focus on iden- 4 tifying which school districts subject to section eight hundred one of 5 the education law provide instruction on such mass starvation in 6 Ireland. Such survey shall include as appropriate, questions on how the 7 district is meeting the learning standards for instruction requirements 8 on such mass starvation in Ireland from 1845 until 1850 pursuant to 9 section eight hundred one of the education law. Such survey shall also 10 require an attestation from each school district superintendent that 11 indicates instruction related to the mass starvation in Ireland is 12 provided at all appropriate grade levels in compliance with section 13 eight hundred one of the education law. 14 § 2. Findings shall include detailed results of the survey, the extent 15 the survey data submitted was compliant with section eight hundred one 16 of the education law, and if needed, recommendations to strengthen 17 provisions of law if not compliant. A report of the findings of such 18 survey shall be delivered to the governor, the temporary president of 19 the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the 20 senate and the minority leader of the assembly the first of January 21 following the effective date of this act or one hundred twenty days 22 after the effective date of this act, whichever is later. 23 § 3. Each school district that does not respond to such survey or does 24 not affirmatively attest that such instruction is provided pursuant to 25 section two of this act shall prepare and implement a corrective action 26 plan to comply with the instruction required by section eight hundred 27 one of the education law. Such corrective action plan shall be submitted 28 for approval by the commissioner of education in a timeframe, and form 29 and format, acceptable to the commissioner. 30 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13703-01-5